Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 3 Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2016
53-10-310. Practice sites where a controlled substance dispensed required to provide for electronic access to the controlled substance database — Exceptions — Violations and penalties.

Each person or entity operating a practice site where a controlled substance is prescribed or dispensed to a human patient shall provide for electronic access to the database at all times when a healthcare practitioner provides healthcare services to a human patient potentially receiving a controlled substance.

This section shall not apply to any person or entity that is not required to report pursuant to § 53-10-304(d) or § 53-10-305(g).

A violation of subsection (a) is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day assessed against the person or entity operating the practice site; provided, however, that the penalty shall only be imposed when there is a continued pattern or practice of not providing electronic access to the database.

Any healthcare practitioner, individual, or entity who is authorized to access the database by this part shall not be subject to a suit for civil damages or held civilly liable for the failure to register in, report to, or check the database, or for actions taken after reasonable reliance on information in the database, or for accessing the database to determine whether or not the healthcare practitioner's professional credentials are being inappropriately used, or for reporting the same to the appropriate authorities, except as otherwise provided in this part.

When prescribing a controlled substance, all healthcare practitioners, unless otherwise exempted under this part, shall check the controlled substance database prior to prescribing one (1) of the controlled substances identified in subdivision (e)(4) to a human patient at the beginning of a new episode of treatment, prior to the issuance of each new prescription for the controlled substance for the first ninety (90) days of a new episode of treatment, and shall check the controlled substance database for that human patient at least every six (6) months when that prescribed controlled substance remains part of the treatment. An authorized healthcare practitioner's delegate may check the controlled substance database on behalf of the healthcare practitioner. A “new episode of treatment” means a prescription for a controlled substance that has not been prescribed by that healthcare practitioner within the previous six (6) months.

When dispensing a controlled substance, all healthcare practitioners, unless otherwise exempted under this part, shall check the controlled substance database prior to dispensing one (1) of the controlled substances identified in subdivision (e)(4) to a human patient the first time that patient is dispensed a controlled substance at that practice site. The dispenser shall check the controlled substance database again at least once every six (6) months for that human patient after the initial dispensing for the duration of time the controlled substance is dispensed to that patient. The initial dispensing check fulfills the check requirement for the first six-month period. An authorized healthcare practitioner's delegate may check the controlled substance database on behalf of the healthcare practitioner.

Before prescribing or dispensing, a healthcare practitioner shall have the professional responsibility to check the database or have a healthcare practitioner delegate check the database if the healthcare practitioner is aware or reasonably certain that a person is attempting to obtain a Schedule II-V controlled substance, identified by the committee or commissioner as demonstrating a potential for abuse for fraudulent, illegal, or medically inappropriate purposes, in violation of § 53-11-402.

The controlled substances that trigger a check of the controlled substance database pursuant to subdivisions (e)(1) and (2) include, but are not limited to, all opioids and benzodiazepines. By rule, the commissioner, pursuant to § 53-10-311, may require a check of the database for additional Schedule II-V controlled substances that are identified by the committee or commissioner as demonstrating a potential for abuse.

The commissioner, pursuant to § 53-10-311, shall adopt rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, that establish standards and procedures to be followed by a healthcare practitioner regarding the review of patient information available through the database.

Healthcare practitioners are not required to check the controlled substance database before prescribing or dispensing one (1) of the controlled substances identified in subdivision (e)(4) or added to that list by the committee or commissioner if one (1) or more of the following conditions are met:

The controlled substance is prescribed or dispensed for a patient who is currently receiving hospice care;

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

The quantity of the controlled substance which is prescribed or dispensed does not exceed an amount which is adequate for a single, three-day treatment period and does not allow a refill; or

The controlled substance is prescribed for administration directly to a patient during the course of inpatient or residential treatment in a hospital or nursing home licensed under title 68.

Each appropriate licensure board may promulgate rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, to establish procedures, notice requirements, and penalties for healthcare practitioners who fail to register in, report to, or check the controlled substance database as required.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, a healthcare practitioner or healthcare practitioner delegate shall not be in violation of this part during any time period in which the controlled substance database is suspended or not operational or the Internet is not operational or available as defined by rules promulgated by the commissioner.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 10; 2018, ch. 1039, §§ 3-5.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (e)(1), inserted “, prior to the issuance of each new prescription for the controlled substance for the first ninety (90) days of a new episode of treatment”, substituted “every six (6) months” for “annually” preceding “when that”, and substituted “six (6) months” for “twelve (12) months” at the end; in (e)(2), substituted “six (6) months” for “twelve (12) months” following “every”, inserted “for the duration of time the controlled substance is dispensed to that patient”, and, in the penultimate sentence, substituted “check requirement for the first six-month period” for “first annual check”; deleted (e)(6)(B) which read: “The committee has determined that healthcare practitioners in a particular medical specialty shall not be required to check the database as a result of the low potential for abuse by patients receiving treatment in that medical specialty;”; and, in (e)(6)(C), substituted “three-day treatment period” for “seven-day treatment period” following “single,”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 10. July 1, 2018; provided that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

53-10-311. Establishment of operations committee — Agreements with federal government and other jurisdictions for sharing and dissemination of data and information.

There is created an operations committee. The committee shall be composed of:

The board of medical examiners' medical director for special projects;

An epidemiologist employed by the department of health;

The executive director of the board of pharmacy;

The director of the controlled substance database;

A member of the controlled substance database committee;

The executive director of the board of nursing as an ex officio non-voting member; and

The executive director of the board of medical examiners as an ex officio non-voting member.

The commissioner shall have the duty to convene the operations committee at least annually and request approval by that committee of actions taken under the authority granted by this part prior to those actions becoming final. The operations committee shall meet at such other times as needed and as convened by the commissioner to confirm or deny decisions made by the commissioner pursuant to the authority granted to the commissioner by this part.

The operations committee's approval shall be necessary for all rules, agreements, and policies concerning:

Access to the database and how that access is obtained;

Dissemination of data and information in the database and control over that data; and

The control, sharing, and dissemination of data and information in the database with other states or other entities acting on behalf of a state.

The operations committee's approval shall not be necessary for any rules, agreements, or policies that concern the daily operations decisions, which may be delegated to the director of the database, concerning establishing, maintaining, or operating the database. The operations committee shall not set fees.

The operations committee may make formal recommendations to the commissioner with respect to any contemplated rulemaking under this part, which does not require its approval.

Three (3) voting members of the operations committee shall constitute a quorum for official actions. A majority of those voting members present shall be necessary to approve an action proposed by the commissioner.

The operations committee shall not be subject to title 8, chapter 44, part 1, regarding public meetings.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, the commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal centers for disease control and prevention (CDC), other states, or other entities acting on behalf of a state for the purposes of sharing and dissemination of data and information in the database.

Any information disseminated pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be for:

Analysis of controlled substance prescriptions for public health research by other state or federal entities charged with protecting the public health; or

Interstate data sharing; provided, the sharing shall only be consistent with the requirements of § 53-10-306.

The commissioner shall have any agreements that the commissioner enters into with the CDC, other states, or other entities acting on behalf of a state or federal government, approved by the operations committee prior to that agreement becoming final.

All agreements entered into by the commissioner subject to this subsection (e) shall be governed by a contract entered into between the two (2) parties.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

53-10-312. Minimum reporting requirements for wholesalers and manufacturers — Establishment of rules as to reporting requirements.

Wholesalers and manufacturers, as defined in § 63-10-204, that sell controlled substances at wholesale must at least report the following information to the committee in Automation of Reports and Consolidated Orders System (ARCOS) format or other mutually acceptable format:

Wholesaler or manufacturer with a drug enforcement administration registration number; provided, that if this number is not applicable, then another mutually acceptable identifier;

Purchaser's drug enforcement administration registration number; provided, that if this number is not applicable, then another mutually acceptable identifier;

National drug code number of the actual drug sold;

Quantity of the drug sold;

Date of sale; and

Transaction identifier or invoice number.

The board may establish such rules as are necessary to specify which medications shall be reported, the time frames for such reporting, and other reporting requirements as required.

A wholesaler shall design and operate a system to disclose to the wholesaler suspicious orders of controlled substances. A wholesaler shall inform the board of pharmacy and the boards whose licensees have prescribing authority of suspicious orders when discovered. Suspicious orders include orders of unusual size, orders deviating substantially from a normal pattern, and orders of unusual frequency.

In the event of the discovery of the theft or significant loss of controlled substances, a wholesaler shall report such theft or significant loss to the committee and local law enforcement within one (1) business day of discovery of the theft or loss.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).